Nebraska, session 109, LB876.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
Section 1. Sections 1 to 8 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Immediate Protection from Abuse Act.
Sec. 2. For purposes of the Immediate Protection from Abuse Act:
(1) Domestic assault offense means any offense under section 28-323;
(2) Family or household members has the same meaning as in section
42-903;
(3) Household pet has the same meaning as in section 26-102;
(4) Law enforcement agency has the same meaning as in section
81-1401;
(5) Law enforcement officer has the same meaning as in section
81-1401;
(6) Protected person means an individual who is protected by an
immediate protective order;
(7) Restrained person means an individual who is arrested for a
domestic assault offense or a sexual assault offense;
(8) Sexual assault offense has the same meaning as in section
26-102; and
(9) Victim means an individual who is the victim of a domestic
assault offense or a sexual assault offense.
Sec. 3. (1) A law enforcement officer may issue an immediate
protective order against a restrained person when:
(a) The law enforcement officer has arrested the restrained person
for a domestic assault offense or a sexual assault offense; and
(b) The officer has reasonable grounds to believe that the
restrained person poses a threat of harm against the victim of such
offense or a family or household member of the victim.
(2) All immediate protective orders shall be issued using the
standard form developed under section 4 of this act.
(3) Unless earlier dissolved under section 6 of this act, an
immediate protective order shall expire at 11:59 p.m. on the third day
after it is issued. If such date is a day that courts are not in session,
-2-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
the order shall remain in effect until 11:59 p.m. on the next day that
courts are in session.
Sec. 4. (1) The State Court Administrator shall develop a standard
form for immediate protective orders to be used under the Immediate
Protection from Abuse Act. The administrator shall develop forms in
English and may develop forms for other languages spoken by Nebraska
residents.
(2) An immediate protective order shall provide that the restrained
person is:
(a) Prohibited from imposing any restraint upon the victim or upon
the liberty of the victim or any family or household member of the
victim;
(b) Prohibited from threatening, assaulting, molesting, attacking,
or otherwise disturbing the peace of the victim or any family or
household member of the victim;
(c) Prohibited from telephoning, contacting, or otherwise
communicating with the victim or any family or household member of the
victim;
(d) Prohibited from entering the residence of the victim or any
family or household member of the victim, regardless of the ownership of
the residence;
(e) Ordered to stay away from any place specified by the law
enforcement officer;
(f) Prohibited from possessing or purchasing a firearm as defined in
section 28-1201;
(g) Directed to relinquish sole possession to the victim or any
family or household member of the victim of any household pet owned,
possessed, leased, kept, or held by the victim or any family or household
member residing in the household of the victim; and
(h) Prohibited from coming into contact with, harming, or killing
any household pet owned, possessed, leased, kept, or held by the victim
-3-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
or any family or household member of the victim.
(3) An immediate protective order shall also include:
(a) A statement of the grounds asserted for the order;
(b) A statement of who is protected by the order;
(c) The date and time the order expires;
(d) The address of the court in which the victim may file a petition
for a protection order under the Protection Orders Act or the restrained
person may file a motion to dissolve under section 6 of this act;
(e) A statement in substantially the following form: "To the person
protected by this order: This order will last only until the date and
time noted above. This order may expire earlier if a court determines it
should not have been issued. If you wish to seek continuing protection,
you must apply for a protection order from the court, at the address
noted above. You may seek the advice of an attorney about any matter
connected with your application for any future court orders. The attorney
should be consulted promptly so that the attorney may assist you in
making your application."; and
(f) A statement in substantially the following form: "To the person
restrained by this order: This order will last until the date and time
noted above. A court will review this order to ensure it was issued
properly. You may also file a motion seeking to dissolve this order prior
to its expiration date. The protected person may, however, obtain a more
permanent protection order from the court. You may seek the advice of an
attorney about any matter connected with filing a motion to dissolve this
order or responding to an application for a more permanent protection
order. The attorney should be consulted promptly so that the attorney may
assist you.".
Sec. 5. (1) When a law enforcement officer issues an immediate
protective order, the officer shall:
(a) Serve a copy on the restrained person;
(b) Make reasonable efforts to provide a copy to the protected
-4-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
person or, if the protected person is a minor, to a parent or guardian of
the minor. If a parent or guardian cannot be located or is the restrained
person, the officer may provide a copy to any person having temporary
custody of the minor;
(c) File a copy of the order with the clerk of the district court as
soon as practicable; and
(d) Forward a copy of the order to the presiding judge for review
under section 6 of this act.
(2) When an immediate protective order is filed with the clerk of
the district court, the clerk shall, as soon as practicable, cause the
order to be entered into the court's electronic case management system
and any database for protection and restraining orders maintained by the
court.
Sec. 6. (1)(a) Upon receipt of a copy of an immediate protective
order, the presiding judge shall review the order and may affirm, modify,
or dissolve the order as provided in this section.
(b) The restrained person may also file a motion with the district
court requesting to dissolve or modify an immediate protective order. The
hearing on the motion shall be given precedence on the docket of the
court. The court shall make a reasonable effort to provide notice of the
motion to the law enforcement officer that issued the order and to any
protected person, but the court may hear the matter ex parte if the
interests of justice require.
(2) Upon its own review or pursuant to a motion filed under this
section, the court may dissolve an immediate protective order only if the
court finds, by clear and convincing evidence, that:
(a) The restrained person did not commit a sexual assault offense or
domestic assault offense; or
(b) The restrained person does not pose a threat of harm to a
protected person or any family or household member of such person.
(3) Upon its own review or pursuant to a motion filed under this
-5-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
section, the court may modify an immediate protective order if the
interests of justice require and the court finds, by clear and convincing
evidence, that such modification will not result in any increased risk of
harm to a protected person or a family or household member of a protected
person.
(4) Unless earlier dissolved under this section, an immediate
protection order shall expire at the time provided in section 3 of this
act. The duration of an immediate protection order shall not be extended
by any proceedings under this section.
(5) Any decision of a court under this section:
(a) Shall have no effect on the ability of a person to file a
petition for a protection order under the Protection Orders Act;
(b) Shall have no effect on any prosecution for a criminal offense;
and
(c) Shall not be admissible in any other criminal or civil
proceeding and shall be given no consideration in any other criminal or
civil proceeding.
Sec. 7. A restrained person who knowingly violates an immediate
protective order shall be guilty of an offense and punished as follows:
(1) For a first violation of this section, such person shall be
guilty of a Class I misdemeanor; and
(2) For a second or subsequent violation of this section, such
person shall be guilty of a Class IV felony.
Sec. 8. A law enforcement officer shall, with or without a warrant,
arrest a person if:
(1) The officer has probable cause to believe that the person has
committed a violation of an immediate protective order; and
(2) Any person provides the officer with a copy of such order or the
officer determines that such an order exists and remains in effect after
communicating with a law enforcement agency.
Sec. 9. Section 26-102, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
-6-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
amended to read:
26-102 For purposes of the Protection Orders Act:
(1) Abuse has the same meaning as in section 42-903;
(2) Course of conduct has the same meaning as in section 28-311.02;
(2) (3) Family or household members has the same meaning as in
section 42-903;
(3) (4) Harass has the same meaning as in section 28-311.02;
(4) (5) Household pet means any animal maintained for companionship
or pleasure but does not include any animal kept primarily for commercial
purposes or for consumption or any livestock animal as defined in section
54-902;
(5) (6) Law enforcement agency means the police department or town
marshal in incorporated municipalities, the office of the sheriff in
unincorporated areas, and the Nebraska State Patrol; and
(6) (7) Sexual assault offense means:
(a) Conduct amounting to sexual assault under section 28-319 or
28-320, sexual abuse by a school worker under section 28-316.01, sexual
assault of a child under section 28-319.01 or 28-320.01, a violation of
section 28-311.08, or an attempt to commit any of such offenses; or
(b) Subjecting or attempting to subject another person to sexual
contact or sexual penetration without such person's consent, as such
terms are defined in section 28-318.
Sec. 10. Section 26-114, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
26-114 (1)(a) Upon the issuance of a temporary ex parte protection
order or final protection order, the clerk of the court shall forthwith
provide, free of charge:
(i) The petitioner with two certified copies of such order;
(ii) The local police department or local law enforcement agency and
the local sheriff's office with one copy each of such order and one copy
each of the sheriff's return thereon; and
-7-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
(iii) A copy of the protection order to the sheriff's office in the
county where the respondent may be personally served, together with
instructions for service.
(b) Upon receipt of the order and instructions for service, the
sheriff's office in the county where the respondent may be personally
served shall forthwith serve the protection order upon the respondent and
file its return thereon with the clerk of the court which issued the
protection order within fourteen days of the issuance of the protection
order.
(2) If any protection order is dismissed or modified by the court,
the clerk of the court shall forthwith provide the local police
department or local law enforcement agency and the local sheriff's
office, without charge, with one copy each of the order of dismissal or
modification.
(3) Any document required to be provided under this section,
including certified copies of protection orders, may be provided
electronically.
(4) If the respondent was present at a hearing convened pursuant to
section 26-108 or 26-109 following issuance of an ex parte protection
order and the court entered a final protection order at such hearing was
not dismissed, the respondent shall be deemed to have notice of by the
court at such hearing that the protection order will be granted and
remain in effect and further service of notice described in this section
is not required for purposes of prosecution under section 26-118.
Sec. 11. Section 28-311.04, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-311.04 (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section,
any person convicted of violating section 28-311.03 is guilty of a Class
I misdemeanor.
(2) Any person convicted of violating section 28-311.03 is guilty of
a Class IIIA felony if:
-8-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
(a) The person has a prior conviction under such section or a
substantially conforming criminal violation within the last seven years;
(b) The victim is under sixteen years of age;
(c) The person possessed a deadly weapon at any time during the
violation;
(d) At any time during the violation, the The person was also in
violation of any protection order issued under the Protection Orders Act,
a or any valid foreign protection order recognized pursuant to section
26-123 or 26-124 or an immediate protective order issued under the
Immediate Protection from Abuse Act at any time during the violation; or
(e) The person has been convicted of any felony in this state or has
been convicted of a crime in another jurisdiction which, if committed in
this state, would constitute a felony and the victim or a family or
household member of the victim was also the victim of such previous
felony.
Sec. 12. Section 28-358.01, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-358.01 (1) Isolation means intentional acts (a) committed for the
purpose of preventing, and which do prevent, a vulnerable adult or senior
adult from having contact with family, friends, or concerned persons; (b)
committed to prevent a vulnerable adult or senior adult from receiving
his or her mail or telephone calls; (c) of physical or chemical restraint
of a vulnerable adult or senior adult committed for purposes of
preventing contact with visitors, family, friends, or other concerned
persons; or (d) which restrict, place, or confine a vulnerable adult or
senior adult in a restricted area for purposes of social deprivation or
preventing contact with family, friends, visitors, or other concerned
persons.
(2) Isolation does not include (a) medical isolation prescribed by a
licensed physician caring for the vulnerable adult or senior adult; (b)
action taken in compliance with a protection order issued under the
-9-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
Protection Orders Act, a valid foreign protection order recognized
pursuant to section 26-123 or 26-124, an immediate protective order
issued under the Immediate Protection from Abuse Act, or an order
excluding a person from certain premises issued pursuant to section
42-357; or (c) action authorized by an administrator of a nursing home
pursuant to section 71-6021.
Sec. 13. Section 28-1205, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-1205 (1)(a) Any person who uses a firearm, a knife, brass or iron
knuckles, or any other deadly weapon to commit any felony which may be
prosecuted in a court of this state commits the offense of use of a
deadly weapon to commit a felony.
(b) Use of a deadly weapon, other than a firearm, to commit a felony
is a Class II felony.
(c) Use of a deadly weapon, which is a firearm, to commit a felony
is a Class IC felony.
(2)(a) Any person who possesses a firearm, a knife, brass or iron
knuckles, or a destructive device during the commission of any felony
which may be prosecuted in a court of this state commits the offense of
possession of a deadly weapon during the commission of a felony.
(b) Possession of a deadly weapon, other than a firearm, during the
commission of a felony is a Class III felony.
(c) Possession of a deadly weapon, which is a firearm, during the
commission of a felony is a Class II felony.
(3)(a) Any person who carries a firearm or a destructive device
during the commission of a dangerous misdemeanor commits the offense of
carrying a firearm or destructive device during the commission of a
dangerous misdemeanor.
(b) A violation of this subsection is a:
(i) Class I misdemeanor for a first or second offense; and
(ii) A Class IV felony for any third or subsequent offense.
-10-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
(4) A violation of this section shall be treated as a separate and
distinct offense from the underlying crimes being committed, and a
sentence imposed under this section shall be consecutive to any other
sentence imposed.
(5) Possession of a deadly weapon may be proved through evidence
demonstrating either actual or constructive possession of a firearm, a
knife, brass or iron knuckles, or a destructive device during,
immediately prior to, or immediately after the commission of a felony.
(6) For purposes of this section:
(a) Dangerous misdemeanor means a misdemeanor violation of any of
the following offenses:
(i) Stalking under section 28-311.03;
(ii) Knowing violation of any protection order issued under the
Protection Orders Act or an immediate protective order issued under the
Immediate Protection from Abuse Act;
(iii) Domestic assault under section 28-323;
(iv) Assault of an unborn child in the third degree under section
28-399;
(v) Theft by shoplifting under section 28-511.01;
(vi) Unauthorized use of a propelled vehicle under section 28-516;
(vii) Criminal mischief under section 28-519 if such violation
arises from an incident involving the commission of a misdemeanor crime
of domestic violence;
(viii) Impersonating a police officer under section 28-610;
(ix) Resisting arrest under section 28-904;
(x) Operating a motor vehicle or vessel to avoid arrest under
section 28-905;
(xi) Obstructing a peace officer under section 28-906; or
(xii) Any attempt under section 28-201 to commit an offense
described in subdivisions (6)(a)(i) through (xi) of this section;
(b) Destructive device has the same meaning as in section 28-1213;
-11-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
(c) Misdemeanor crime of domestic violence has the same meaning as
in section 28-1206; and
(d) Use of a deadly weapon includes the discharge, employment, or
visible display of any part of a firearm, a knife, brass or iron
knuckles, any other deadly weapon, or a destructive device during,
immediately prior to, or immediately after the commission of a felony or
communication to another indicating the presence of a firearm, a knife,
brass or iron knuckles, any other deadly weapon, or a destructive device
during, immediately prior to, or immediately after the commission of a
felony, regardless of whether such firearm, knife, brass or iron
knuckles, deadly weapon, or destructive device was discharged, actively
employed, or displayed.
Sec. 14. Section 28-1206, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-1206 (1) A person commits the offense of possession of a deadly
weapon by a prohibited person if he or she:
(a) Possesses a firearm, a knife, or brass or iron knuckles and he
or she:
(i) Has previously been convicted of a felony;
(ii) Is a fugitive from justice;
(iii) Is the subject of a current and valid protection order issued
under the Protection Orders Act, or a current and valid foreign
protection order recognized under section 26-123 or 26-124, or a current
and valid immediate protective order issued under the Immediate
Protection from Abuse Act and is knowingly violating such order; or
(iv) Is on probation pursuant to a deferred judgment for a felony
under section 29-2292 or 29-4803; or
(b) Possesses a firearm or brass or iron knuckles and he or she has
been convicted within the past seven years of a misdemeanor crime of
domestic violence.
(2) The felony conviction may have been had in any court in the
-12-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
United States, the several states, territories, or possessions, or the
District of Columbia.
(3)(a) Possession of a deadly weapon which is not a firearm by a
prohibited person is a Class III felony.
(b) Possession of a deadly weapon which is a firearm by a prohibited
person is a Class ID felony for a first offense and a Class IB felony for
a second or subsequent offense.
(4) Subdivision (1)(a)(i) of this section shall not prohibit:
(a) Possession of archery equipment for lawful purposes; or
(b) If in possession of a recreational license, possession of a
knife for purposes of butchering, dressing, or otherwise processing or
harvesting game, fish, or furs.
(5)(a) For purposes of this section, misdemeanor crime of domestic
violence means a crime that:
(i) Is classified as a misdemeanor under the laws of the United
States or the District of Columbia or the laws of any state, territory,
possession, or tribe;
(ii) Has, as an element, the use or attempted use of physical force
or the threatened use of a deadly weapon; and
(iii) Is committed by another against his or her spouse, his or her
former spouse, a person with whom he or she has a child in common whether
or not they have been married or lived together at any time, or a person
with whom he or she is or was involved in a dating relationship as
defined in section 28-323.
(b) For purposes of this section, misdemeanor crime of domestic
violence also includes the following offenses, if committed by a person
against his or her spouse, his or her former spouse, a person with whom
he or she is or was involved in a dating relationship as defined in
section 28-323, or a person with whom he or she has a child in common
whether or not they have been married or lived together at any time:
(i) Assault in the third degree under section 28-310;
-13-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
(ii) Stalking under subsection (1) of section 28-311.04;
(iii) False imprisonment in the second degree under section 28-315;
(iv) First offense domestic assault in the third degree under
subsection (1) of section 28-323; or
(v) Any attempt or conspiracy to commit any of such offenses.
(c) A person shall not be considered to have been convicted of a
misdemeanor crime of domestic violence unless:
(i) The person was represented by counsel in the case or knowingly
and intelligently waived the right to counsel in the case; and
(ii) In the case of a prosecution for a misdemeanor crime of
domestic violence for which a person was entitled to a jury trial in the
jurisdiction in which the case was tried, either:
(A) The case was tried to a jury; or
(B) The person knowingly and intelligently waived the right to have
the case tried to a jury.
(6) In addition, for purposes of this section:
(a) Archery equipment means:
(i) A longbow, recurve bow, compound bow, or nonelectric crossbow
that is drawn or cocked with human power and released by human power; and
(ii) Target or hunting arrows, including arrows with broad, fixed,
or removable heads or that contain multiple sharp cutting edges; and
(b) Recreational license means a state-issued license, certificate,
registration, permit, tag, sticker, or other similar document or
identifier evidencing permission to hunt, fish, or trap for furs in the
State of Nebraska.
Sec. 15. Section 29-2292, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
29-2292 (1) Upon a finding of guilt for which a judgment of
conviction may be rendered, a defendant may request the court defer the
entry of judgment of conviction. Upon such request and after giving the
prosecutor and defendant the opportunity to be heard, the court may defer
-14-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
the entry of a judgment of conviction and the imposition of a sentence
and place the defendant on probation, upon conditions as the court may
require under section 29-2262.
(2) The court shall not defer judgment under this section if:
(a) The offense is a violation of a domestic abuse protection order
under section 26-118 or an immediate protective order under section 7 of
this act;
(b) The victim of the offense is an intimate partner as defined in
section 28-323;
(c) The offense is a violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197 or a
city or village ordinance enacted in conformance with section 60-6,196 or
60-6,197;
(d) The defendant is not eligible for probation; or
(e) For any driver holding a commercial driver's license or CLP-
commercial learner's permit issued pursuant to the Motor Vehicle
Operator's License Act, such deferred judgment would mask the conviction
and lead to noncompliance with federal law or regulation and subject this
state to possible loss of federal money.
(3) Whenever a court considers a request to defer judgment, the
court shall consider the factors set forth in section 29-2260 and any
other information the court deems relevant.
(4) Except as otherwise provided in this section and sections
29-2293 and 29-2294, the supervision of a defendant on probation pursuant
to a deferred judgment shall be governed by the Nebraska Probation
Administration Act and sections 29-2270 to 29-2273.
(5) After a hearing providing the prosecutor and defendant an
opportunity to be heard and upon a finding that a defendant has violated
a condition of his or her probation, the court may enter any order
authorized by section 29-2268 or pronounce judgment and impose such new
sentence as might have been originally imposed for the offense for which
the defendant was convicted.
-15-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
(6) Upon satisfactory completion of the conditions of probation and
the payment or waiver of all administrative and programming fees assessed
under section 29-2293, the defendant or prosecutor may file a motion to
withdraw any plea entered by the defendant and to dismiss the action
without entry of judgment.
(7) The provisions of this section apply to offenses committed on or
after July 1, 2020. For purposes of this section, an offense shall be
deemed to have been committed prior to July 1, 2020, if any element of
the offense occurred prior to such date.
Sec. 16. Section 29-4315, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement,
2024, is amended to read:
29-4315 (1) Upon an initial interaction with a victim relating to or
arising from a sexual assault of such victim, a health care provider or
peace officer, and in the case of a victim under eighteen years of age,
the Department of Health and Human Services, shall provide the victim
with information that explains the rights of victims under the Sexual
Assault Victims' Bill of Rights Act and other relevant law. The
information shall be presented in clear language that is comprehensible
to a person proficient in English at the fifth grade level, accessible to
persons with visual disabilities, and available in all major languages
spoken in this state. This information shall include, but not be limited
to:
(a) A clear statement that a victim is not required to participate
in the criminal justice system or to undergo a medical evidentiary or
physical examination in order to retain the rights provided by the act
and other relevant law;
(b) Contact information for appropriate services provided by
professionals in the fields of domestic violence and sexual assault,
including advocates;
(c) State and federal relief available to victims of crime;
(d) Law enforcement protection available to the victim, including
-16-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
immediate protective orders, domestic violence protection orders,
harassment protection orders, and sexual assault protection orders and
the process to obtain such protection;
(e) Instructions for requesting information regarding the victim's
sexual assault forensic evidence as provided in section 29-4313; and
(f) State and federal compensation funds for medical and other costs
associated with the sexual assault and information on any municipal,
state, or federal right to restitution for a victim in the event of a
conviction.
(2) The information to be provided under subsection (1) of this
section shall be developed by the Attorney General and the Nebraska
Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice with input from
prosecutors, sexual assault victims, and organizations with a statewide
presence with expertise on domestic violence, sexual assault, and child
sexual assault.
(3) The information to be provided under subsection (1) of this
section shall be made available for viewing and download on the websites
of the Department of Health and Human Services and the Nebraska
Commission on Law Enforcement and Criminal Justice. Other relevant state
agencies are also encouraged to make such information available on their
websites.
Sec. 17. Section 42-927, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
42-927 All law enforcement agencies in the state shall provide
officers employed by them with an education and training program designed
to inform the officers of the problems of domestic abuse, procedures to
deal with such problems, the Immediate Protection from Abuse Act, the
Protection from Domestic Abuse Act, the Protection Orders Act, and the
services and facilities available to abused family and household members.
Sec. 18. Section 60-3209, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
-17-

LB876 LB876
2026 2026
60-3209 (1) Captured plate data held by a governmental entity is not
considered a public record for purposes of sections 84-712 to 84-712.09
and shall only be disclosed to the person to whom the vehicle is
registered or with the prior written consent of the person to whom the
vehicle is registered or pursuant to a disclosure order under subsection
(2) of section 60-3205 or as the result of a match pursuant to subsection
(2) of section 60-3203.
(2) Upon the presentation to a governmental entity of a valid,
outstanding protection order pursuant to the Protection Orders Act or the
Uniform Interstate Enforcement of Domestic Violence Protection Orders Act
or an immediate protective order issued under the Immediate Protection
from Abuse Act protecting the driver of a vehicle jointly registered with
or registered solely in the name of the individual against whom the order
was issued, captured plate data may not be disclosed except pursuant to a
disclosure order under subsection (2) of section 60-3205 or as the result
of a match pursuant to subsection (2) of section 60-3203.
Sec. 19. Original section 29-4315, Revised Statutes Cumulative
Supplement, 2024, and sections 26-102, 26-114, 28-311.04, 28-358.01,
28-1205, 28-1206, 29-2292, 42-927, and 60-3209, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-18-